Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF113.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin NORTHERN LIGHTS SPECIAL EDUCATION COOPERATIVE NO. 6096-52; EDUCATION LEARNING CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $6,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of education for a grant to Northern Lights Special Education Cooperative No. 6096-52, to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip an education learning center to house a regional educational program for students with autism, cognitive disabilities, emotional and behavioral disorders, and other students with specific educational needs, including space to house a Level IV setting regional special education program, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. This appropriation does not require a nonstate match. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin AREA SPECIAL EDUCATION COOPERATIVE NO. 997; EDUCATION LEARNING CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $6,500,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of education for a grant to Area Special Education Cooperative No. 997, to predesign, design, construct, renovate, furnish, and equip an education learning center to house a regional educational program for students with autism, cognitive disabilities, emotional and behavioral disorders, and other students with specific educational needs, including space to house a Level IV setting regional special education program, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. This appropriation does not require a nonstate match. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $6,500,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end